Utah statutes.
48-3a-1025.   Statement of merger.

(1)  A statement of merger must be signed by each merging entity and delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  A statement of merger must contain:

(a)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of each merging entity that is not the surviving entity;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the surviving entity;

(c)  a statement that the merger was approved by each domestic merging entity, if any, in accordance with Sections 48-3a-1021 through 48-3a-1026 and by each foreign merging entity, if any, in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

(d)  if the surviving entity exists before the merger and is a domestic filing entity, any amendment to its public organic record approved as part of the plan of merger;

(e)  if the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment;

(f)  if the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

(g)  if the surviving entity is a foreign entity that is not a registered foreign entity, a mailing address to which the division may send any process served on the division pursuant to Subsection 48-3a-1026(5).

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a statement of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4)  If the surviving entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, but the public organic record does not need to be signed.

(5)  A plan of merger that is signed by all the merging entities and meets all the requirements of Subsection (2) may be delivered to the division for filing instead of a statement of merger and on filing has the same effect.  If a plan of merger is filed as provided in this Subsection (5), references in this part to a statement of merger refer to the plan of merger filed under this Subsection (5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

